Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202568-2302
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Family Home Visitation Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(2) Home visitation program means a voluntary program carried out in relevant settings, primarily in the homes of families with one or more children, five years of age or younger, or pregnant persons.

Laws 2025, LB22, § 2.